New York, session 2025-2026, S963.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 840 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 8 to read as follows: 3 8. The council shall, in addition: 4 (a) Develop, maintain and disseminate a minimum standards policy 5 governing the use of automatic license plate reader systems. The minimum 6 standards policy shall include, but not be limited to, provisions on 7 permissible uses of the automatic license plate reader technology, data 8 sharing and dissemination, prohibited uses, record retention and manage- 9 ment, and training. For purposes of this section, "automatic license 10 plate reader system" or "ALPR system" shall mean a system of one or more 11 mobile or fixed high-speed cameras used in combination with computer 12 algorithms to convert images of license plates into computer-readable 13 data. 14 (b) Recommend to the governor, the temporary president of the senate 15 and the speaker of the assembly, rules and regulations with respect to 16 the establishment and implementation on an ongoing basis of a training 17 program for all current and new police officers regarding the policies 18 and procedures established pursuant to this subdivision, along with 19 recommendations for periodic retraining of police officers. 20 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 837-y to 21 read as follows: 22 § 837-y. Disclosure of the minimum standards policy for automatic 23 license plate readers by law enforcement agencies. All state and local 24 enforcement agencies shall conspicuously post the minimum standards for EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03210-01-5 S. 963 2 1 the use of automatic license plate reader systems policy, as promulgated 2 under section eight hundred forty of this article on its website, or if 3 such law enforcement agency does not maintain a website, in its main 4 office. Such policy shall be made available to the public upon request. 5 § 3. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 6 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any 7 rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its 8 effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 9 effective date.